Louisiana, session 2026, HB1188.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 35 of Title 51 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 51:2161 through 2163, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 35. PROTECTING MINORS FROM CHATBOT HARM ACT
§2161. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms have the meanings ascribed to
them in this Section:
(1) "Account holder" means an individual that opens an account with, or
creates a profile with, or is identified with a unique identifier by a companion chatbot
platform while that individual is using or accessing the platform, if that platform
knows or has reason to believe that individual is a resident of this state.
(2) "Artificial intelligence" means an engineered or machine-based system
that varies in its level of autonomy and that can, for explicit or implicit objectives,
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2507 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1188
infer from the input it receives how to generate outputs that influence physical or
virtual environments.
(3)(a) "Companion chatbot" means an artificial intelligence system with a
natural language interface that provides adaptive, human-like responses to user
inputs and is capable of meeting a user's social needs, including by exhibiting
anthropomorphic features and being able to sustain a relationship across multiple
interactions.
(b) "Companion chatbot" does not include any of the following:
(i) A bot used only for customer service or for a business's operational
purposes, productivity, or analysis related to source information, internal research,
or technical assistance.
(ii) A bot that is a feature of a video game, is limited to replies related to that
video game, and does not discuss topics related to mental health, self-harm, or
material harmful to minors, or maintain a dialogue on other topics unrelated to the
video game.
(iii) A stand-alone consumer electronic device that functions as a speaker
and voice command interface, acts as a voice-activated virtual assistant, and does not
sustain a relationship across multiple interactions or generate outputs likely to elicit
emotional responses in the user.
(4) "Companion chatbot platform" means a platform that allows a user to
engage with a companion chatbot.
(5) "Material harmful to minors" has the same meaning as defined in R.S.
51:2121.
(6) "Minor" means any person who has not attained the age of eighteen years.
§2162. Requirements for companion chatbot platforms
A. A companion chatbot platform shall prohibit a minor from entering into
a contract with the platform to become an account holder or from maintaining an
existing account, unless the minor's parent or guardian provides consent for the
minor to become an account holder or maintain an existing account.
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2507 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1188
(1) If the minor's parent or guardian provides consent for the minor to
become an account holder or maintain an existing account, the companion chatbot
platform shall allow the consenting parent or guardian of the minor account holder
to do all of the following:
(a) Obtain copies of all interactions between the account holder and the
companion chatbot.
(b) Limit the amount of time that the account holder may interact with the
companion chatbot each day.
(c) Limit the days of the week and the times during the day when the account
holder may interact with the companion chatbot.
(d) Disable any of the interactions between the account holder and
third-party account holders on the companion chatbot platform.
(e) Receive timely notifications if the account holder expresses to the
companion chatbot a desire or an intent to engage in self-harm or to harm others.
(2) A companion chatbot platform shall do all of the following:
(a) Terminate an account belonging to an account holder who is a minor if
the companion chatbot platform treats or categorizes that account as belonging to a
minor for purposes of targeting content or advertising and if the minor's parent or
guardian has not provided consent for that minor to become an account holder or to
maintain an existing account. The companion chatbot platform shall provide ninety
days for the account holder to dispute the termination. Termination shall be effective
upon the expiration of the ninety-day period if the account holder fails to effectively
dispute the termination.
(b) Allow an account holder who is a minor to request termination of the
account. Termination shall be effective within five business days of the request.
(c) Allow the consenting parent or guardian of an account holder who is a
minor to request that the minor's account be terminated. Termination shall be
effective within ten business days following the request.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2507 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1188
(d) Permanently delete all personal information held by the companion
chatbot platform relating to the terminated account, unless state or federal law
requires the platform to maintain the information.
B. In connection with all accounts held by account holders who are minors,
a companion chatbot platform shall do all of the following:
(1) Disclose to the account holder that he is interacting with artificial
intelligence.
(2) Provide by default a clear and conspicuous notification to the account
holder, at the beginning of companion chatbot interactions and at least once every
hour during continuing interactions, reminding the minor to take a break and that the
companion chatbot is artificially-generated and not human.
(3) Institute reasonable measures to prevent its companion chatbot from
producing or sharing material harmful to minors or encouraging the account holder
to engage in any of the conduct described or depicted in materials harmful to minors.
§2163. Penalties; unfair trade practice; cause of action
A.(1) A knowing or reckless violation of this Chapter is deemed a deceptive
or unfair trade practice or act pursuant to the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer
Protection Law, R.S. 51:1401 et seq.
(2) If the attorney general has reason to believe that a companion chatbot
platform is in violation of this Chapter, the attorney general may bring an action
against that platform for a deceptive or unfair trade practice or act.
(3) In addition to other remedies provided for in this Section, the attorney
general may impose a civil penalty of up to fifty thousand dollars per violation as
well as reasonable attorney fees and court costs.
(4) If the companion chatbot platform's failure to comply with this Chapter
is part of a consistent pattern of knowing or reckless conduct, punitive damages may
be assessed against the companion chatbot platform.
B.(1) A companion chatbot platform that knowingly or recklessly violates
this Chapter shall be liable to a minor account holder for up to ten thousand dollars
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2507 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1188
in damages, as well as court costs and reasonable attorney fees, as ordered by the
court.
(2) A civil action for a claim pursuant to this Subsection may be brought
within two years of the date the complainant knew, or reasonably should have
known, of the alleged violation.
(3) An action brought pursuant to this Subsection may be brought only on
behalf of a minor account holder.
C. For purposes of bringing an action in accordance with this Chapter, a
companion chatbot platform that allows a minor account holder in this state to create
an account on the platform is considered to be both engaged in substantial and not
isolated activities within this state and operating, conducting, engaging in, or
carrying on a business and doing business in this state, and is therefore subject to the
jurisdiction of the courts of this state.
D. If a companion chatbot platform allows a minor account holder to use that
companion chatbot platform, the parties have entered into a contract.
E. This Section does not preclude any other available remedy at law or
equity.